Washington statutes.
RCW 26.19.020

Child support economic table.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1014.SL) ***

ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

combined

monthly

net

income

one

child

family

two

children

family

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

216

167

1100

238

184

1200

260

200

1300

281

217

1400

303

234

1500

325

251

1600

346

267

1700

368

284

1800

390

301

1900

412

317

2000

433

334

2100

455

350

2200

477

367

2300

499

384

2400

521

400

2500

543

417

2600

565

433

2700

587

450

2800

609

467

2900

630

483

3000

652

500

3100

674

516

3200

696

533

3300

718

550

3400

740

566

3500

762

583

3600

784

599

3700

803

614

3800

816

624

3900

830

634

4000

843

643

4100

857

653

4200

867

660

4300

877

668

4400

887

675

4500

896

682

4600

906

689

4700

916

697

4800

927

705

4900

939

714

5000

951

723

5100

963

732

5200

975

741

5300

987

750

5400

999

759

5500

1011

768

5600

1023

777

5700

1030

782

5800

1036

786

5900

1042

791

6000

1048

795

6100

1054

800

6200

1061

804

6300

1067

809

6400

1073

813

6500

1081

819

6600

1096

830

6700

1111

842

6800

1126

853

6900

1141

864

7000

1156

875

7100

1170

886

7200

1185

898

7300

1200

909

7400

1212

918

7500

1222

925

7600

1231

932

7700

1241

939

7800

1251

946

7900

1261

953

8000

1270

960

8100

1280

968

8200

1290

975

8300

1299

981

8400

1308

987

8500

1316

994

8600

1325

1000

8700

1334

1007

8800

1343

1013

8900

1352

1019

9000

1361

1026

9100

1370

1032

9200

1379

1040

9300

1387

1047

9400

1396

1055

9500

1405

1062

9600

1414

1069

9700

1423

1077

9800

1432

1084

9900

1441

1092

10000

1451

1099

10100

1462

1107

10200

1473

1114

10300

1484

1122

10400

1495

1129

10500

1507

1136

10600

1518

1144

10700

1529

1151

10800

1539

1159

10900

1542

1161

11000

1545

1164

11100

1548

1166

11200

1551

1169

11300

1554

1172

11400

1556

1174

11500

1559

1177

11600

1562

1179

11700

1565

1182

11800

1568

1184

11900

1571

1187

12000

1573

1190

combined

monthly

net

income

three

children

family

four

children

family

five

children

family

For income less than $1000 the obligation is based upon the resources and living expenses of each household. Minimum support may not be less than $50 per child per month except when allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000

136

114

100

1100

150

125

110

1200

163

137

120

1300

177

148

130

1400

191

160

141

1500

204

171

151

1600

218

182

161

1700

231

194

171

1800

245

205

180

1900

258

216

190

2000

271

227

200

2100

285

239

210

2200

298

250

220

2300

311

261

230

2400

325

272

239

2500

338

283

249

2600

351

294

259

2700

365

305

269

2800

378

317

279

2900

391

328

288

3000

405

339

298

3100

418

350

308

3200

431

361

318

3300

444

372

328

3400

458

384

337

3500

471

395

347

3600

484

406

357

3700

496

416

366

3800

503

422

371

3900

511

428

377

4000

518

434

382

4100

526

440

388

4200

531

445

392

4300

537

450

396

4400

543

455

400

4500

548

459

404

4600

554

464

408

4700

559

469

412

4800

566

474

417

4900

573

480

422

5000

580

486

428

5100

587

492

433

5200

594

498

438

5300

602

504

443

5400

609

510

449

5500

616

516

454

5600

623

522

459

5700

627

525

462

5800

630

528

465

5900

634

531

467

6000

637

534

470

6100

641

537

472

6200

644

540

475

6300

648

543

477

6400

651

545

480

6500

656

549

483

6600

665

557

490

6700

674

564

497

6800

683

572

503

6900

692

579

510

7000

701

587

516

7100

710

594

523

7200

719

602

530

7300

727

609

536

7400

734

615

541

7500

740

620

545

7600

745

624

549

7700

751

629

554

7800

756

634

558

7900

762

638

562

8000

767

643

566

8100

773

647

570

8200

778

652

574

8300

783

656

577

8400

788

660

581

8500

793

664

584

8600

797

668

588

8700

802

672

591

8800

807

676

595

8900

812

680

599

9000

817

684

602

9100

822

689

606

9200

828

694

611

9300

835

699

616

9400

841

705

620

9500

848

710

625

9600

854

716

630

9700

861

721

635

9800

867

727

639

9900

874

732

644

10000

879

737

648

10100

885

741

652

10200

890

745

656

10300

895

750

660

10400

900

754

664

10500

906

759

668

10600

911

763

672

10700

916

767

675

10800

921

772

679

10900

924

774

681

11000

926

776

683

11100

928

778

684

11200

931

780

686

11300

933

782

688

11400

936

784

690

11500

938

786

692

11600

940

788

693

11700

943

790

695

11800

945

792

697

11900

948

794

699

12000

950

796

700

The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and including twelve thousand dollars. When combined monthly net income exceeds twelve thousand dollars, the court may exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net incomes of twelve thousand dollars upon written findings of fact.

[ 2018 c 150 s 301; 2009 c 84 s 1; 1998 c 163 s 2; 1991 c 367 s 25; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 19; 1989 c 175 s 76; 1988 c 275 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 150 ss 201-401: See note following RCW 26.23.065.

Effective date—2009 c 84: "This act takes effect October 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 84 s 6.]

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective dates—Severability—1988 c 275: See notes following RCW 26.19.001.